Utah statutes.
76-9-802.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Criminal street gang" means an organization, association in fact, or group of three or more persons, whether operated formally or informally:

(a)  that is currently in operation;

(b)  that has as one of its primary activities the commission of one or more predicate gang crimes;

(c)  that has, as a group, an identifying name or identifying sign or symbol, or both; and

(d)  whose members, acting individually or in concert with other members, engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal gang activity.

(2)  "Intimidate" means the use of force, duress, violence, coercion, menace, or threat of harm for the purpose of causing an individual to act or refrain from acting.

(3)  "Minor" means a person younger than 18 years of age.

(4)  "Pattern of criminal gang activity" means:

(a)  committing, attempting to commit, conspiring to commit, or soliciting the commission of two or more predicate gang crimes within five years;

(b)  the predicate gang crimes are:

(i)  committed by two or more persons; or

(ii)  committed by an individual at the direction of, or in association with a criminal street gang; and

(c)  the criminal activity was committed with the specific intent to promote, further, or assist in any criminal conduct by members of the criminal street gang.

(5) (a)  "Predicate gang crime" means any of the following offenses:

(i)  Title 41, Chapter 1a, Motor Vehicle Act:

(A)  Section 41-1a-1313, regarding possession of a motor vehicle without an identification number;

(B)  Section 41-1a-1315, regarding false evidence of title and registration;

(C)  Section 41-1a-1316, regarding receiving or transferring stolen vehicles;

(D)  Section 41-1a-1317, regarding selling or buying a motor vehicle without an identification number; or

(E)  Section 41-1a-1318, regarding the fraudulent alteration of an identification number;

(ii)  any criminal violation of the following provisions:

(A)  Title 58, Chapter 37, Utah Controlled Substances Act;

(B)  Title 58, Chapter 37a, Utah Drug Paraphernalia Act;

(C)  Title 58, Chapter 37b, Imitation Controlled Substances Act; or

(D)  Title 58, Chapter 37c, Utah Controlled Substance Precursor Act;

(iii)  Sections 76-5-102 through 76-5-103.5, which address assault offenses;

(iv)  Title 76, Chapter 5, Part 2, Criminal Homicide;

(v)  Sections 76-5-301 through 76-5-304, which address kidnapping and related offenses;

(vi)  any felony offense under Title 76, Chapter 5, Part 4, Sexual Offenses;

(vii)  Title 76, Chapter 6, Part 1, Property Destruction;

(viii)  Title 76, Chapter 6, Part 2, Burglary and Criminal Trespass;

(ix)  Title 76, Chapter 6, Part 3, Robbery;

(x)  any felony offense under Title 76, Chapter 6, Part 4, Theft, or under Title 76, Chapter 6, Part 6, Retail Theft, except Sections 76-6-404.5, 76-6-405, 76-6-407, 76-6-408, 76-6-409, 76-6-409.1, 76-6-409.3, 76-6-409.6, 76-6-409.7, 76-6-409.8, 76-6-409.9, 76-6-410, and 76-6-410.5;

(xi)  Title 76, Chapter 6, Part 5, Fraud, except Sections 76-6-504, 76-6-505, 76-6-507, 76-6-508, 76-6-509, 76-6-510, 76-6-511, 76-6-512, 76-6-513, 76-6-514, 76-6-516, 76-6-517, 76-6-518, and 76-6-520;

(xii)  Title 76, Chapter 6, Part 11, Identity Fraud Act;

(xiii)  Title 76, Chapter 8, Part 3, Obstructing Governmental Operations, except Sections 76-8-302, 76-8-303, 76-8-304, 76-8-307, 76-8-308, and 76-8-312;

(xiv)  Section 76-8-508, which includes tampering with a witness;

(xv)  Section 76-8-508.3, which includes retaliation against a witness or victim;

(xvi)  Section 76-8-509, which includes extortion or bribery to dismiss a criminal proceeding;

(xvii)  Title 76, Chapter 10, Part 3, Explosives;

(xviii)  Title 76, Chapter 10, Part 5, Weapons;

(xix)  Title 76, Chapter 10, Part 15, Bus Passenger Safety Act;

(xx)  Title 76, Chapter 10, Part 16, Pattern of Unlawful Activity Act;

(xxi)  Section 76-10-1801, which addresses communications fraud;

(xxii)  Title 76, Chapter 10, Part 19, Money Laundering and Currency Transaction Reporting Act; or

(xxiii)  Section 76-10-2002, which addresses burglary of a research facility.

(b)  "Predicate gang crime" also includes:

(i)  any state or federal criminal offense that by its nature involves a substantial risk that physical force may be used against another in the course of committing the offense; and

(ii)  any felony violation of a criminal statute of any other state, the United States, or any district, possession, or territory of the United States which would constitute a violation of any offense in Subsection (4)(a) if committed in this state.



Amended by Chapter 157, 2009 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 356, 2009 General Session

